src/third-party/hunspell-dictionaries/lt.aff
SFX Q  ias    tokiems          ias      
SFX Q  ias    tokus            ias      
SFX Q  ias    tokais           ias      
SFX Q  ias    tokuose          ias      
SFX Q  ias    toka             ias      
SFX Q  ias    tokos            ias      
SFX Q  ias    tokoje           ias      
SFX Q  ias    tokoms           ias      
SFX Q  ias    tokomis          ias      
SFX Q  ias    tokose           ias      
SFX Q d ias   dokai           d ias     
SFX Q d ias   dokas           d ias     
SFX Q d ias   doko            d ias     
SFX Q d ias   dokam           d ias     
SFX Q d ias   dok             d ias     
SFX Q d ias   doku            d ias     
SFX Q d ias   dokame          d ias     
SFX Q d ias   doki            d ias     
SFX Q d ias   dok             d ias     
SFX Q d ias   dokiems         d ias     
SFX Q d ias   dokus           d ias     
SFX Q d ias   dokais          d ias     
SFX Q d ias   dokuose         d ias     
SFX Q d ias   doka            d ias     
SFX Q d ias   dokos           d ias     
SFX Q d ias   dokoje          d ias     
SFX Q d ias   dokoms          d ias     
SFX Q d ias   dokomis         d ias     
SFX Q d ias   dokose          d ias     
SFX Q us      okai            us        
SFX Q us      okas            us        
SFX Q us      oko             us        
SFX Q us      okam            us        
SFX Q us      ok              us        
SFX Q us      oku             us        
SFX Q us      okame           us        
SFX Q us      oki             us        
SFX Q us      ok              us        
SFX Q us      okiems          us        
SFX Q us      okus            us        
SFX Q us      okais           us        
SFX Q us      okuose          us        
SFX Q us      oka             us        
SFX Q us      okos            us        
SFX Q us      okoje           us        
SFX Q us      okoms           us        
SFX Q us      okomis          us        
SFX Q us      okose           us        
