src/third-party/hunspell-dictionaries/lt.dic
abejuti kas/ANQ
adekvatus/AMNQ
aidingas/ANQ
aistrus/ANQ
akipl  i kas/ANQ
aklas/ANQ
akrobati kas/ANQ
alavingas/ANQ
alyvuotas/ANQ
alternatyvus/AQ
ambulatori kas/ANQ
analiti kas/ANQ
angliuotas/ANQ
ankstybas/ANQ
anonimi kas/ANQ
anti kas/ANQ
apati kas/ANQ
apgaulingas/ANQ
apyvartus/ANQ
aplamas/ANQ
ap nekus/ANQ
apveidus/ANQ
arabi kas/ANQ
aromatingas/ANQ
a arotas/ANQ
asmeni kas/ANQ
a tuonnytas/ANQ
atgajus/ANQ
atitinkamas/ANQ
atkragus/ANQ
atliekamas/ANQ
atpakalias/ANQ
atsakomas/ANQ
atskiras/ANQ
atstangus/ANQ
at agarias/ANQ
augalotas/ANQ
auk tas/ADNQ
ausuotas/ANQ
avi otas/ANQ
baisus/ANQ
balsus/ANQ
balzganas/ANQ
barstus/ANQ
baug tus/ANQ
beg di kas/ANQ
benzinuotas/ANQ
be ali kas/ANQ
betarpi kas/ANQ
birus/ANQ
blaivus/ANQ
bla kus/ANQ
bobi kas/ANQ
brankus/ANQ
brol udi kas/ANQ
b dingas/ANQ
bulv tas/ANQ
charakteringas/ANQ
cini kas/ANQ
dabnus/ANQ
daiktavardi kas/ANQ
dalgus/ANQ
dangi kas/ANQ
darbus/ANQ
darus/ANQ
daugiaprasmi kas/ANQ
debesingas/ANQ
degus/ANQ
delsus/ANQ
demonstratyvus/ANQ
de imteriopas/ANQ
desperati kas/ANQ
devynianytas/ANQ
didus/ANQ
dievi kas/ANQ
diplomati kas/ANQ
disciplinuotas/ANQ
dyglus/ANQ
domus/ANQ
dovanas/ANQ
dramblotas/ANQ
drasti kas/ANQ
dr btas/ANQ
drev tas/ANQ
drovingas/ANQ
drumzlus/ANQ
druskinas/ANQ
duburiuotas/ANQ
dulk tas/ANQ
dumblinas/ANQ
duolas/ANQ
durp tas/ANQ
dvasingas/ANQ
dvide imteriopas/ANQ
dvisus/ANQ
d insuotas/ANQ
egl tas/ANQ
egzoti kas/ANQ
ekologi kas/ANQ
ekstravaganti kas/ANQ
elastingas/ANQ
elgeti kas/ANQ
entuziastingas/ANQ
erdvokas/ANQ
er k tingas/ANQ
eti kas/ANQ
fakultatyvus/ANQ
fatalus/ANQ
fizi kas/ANQ
fotogeni kas/ANQ
gailestingas/ANQ
gaisruotas/ANQ
gai us/ANQ
galionuotas/ANQ
gan tinas/ANQ
garbus/ANQ
garsus/ANQ
gatavas/ANQ
gausus/ANQ
geid iamas/ANQ
geltas/ANQ
geninas/ANQ
gerklingas/ANQ
giganti kas/ANQ
ginkluotas/ANQ
girklus/ANQ
gyvastingas/ANQ
glam us/ANQ
gle nas/ANQ
glodus/ANQ
gnaibus/ANQ
goslus/ANQ
gracingas/ANQ
gramozdi kas/ANQ
grauzdus/ANQ
grem zdi kas/ANQ
grie tas/ANQ
grioviuotas/ANQ
grobiki kas/ANQ
grubus/ANQ
gruobl tas/ANQ
guls ias/ANQ
gurus/ANQ
hermeti kas/ANQ
humani kas/ANQ
il iuotas/ANQ
ilgus/ANQ
imunus/ANQ
iniciatyvinis/BQ
instinktyvus/ANQ
intraverti kas/ANQ
irzus/ANQ
i didus/ANQ
i g stingas/ANQ
i kilnus/ANQ
i lakus/ANQ
i moningas/ANQ
i rai kus/ANQ
i taigingas/ANQ
i tisas/ANQ
i vaizdus/ANQ
ydingas/ANQ
jaunas/ANQ
jauslus/ANQ
judrus/ANQ
juodbruvas/ANQ
juozganas/ANQ
kablus/ANQ
kaimyni kas/ANQ
kalaviji kas/ANQ
kalk tas/ANQ
kaltas/ADNQ
kalvotas/ANQ
kamuoli kas/ANQ
kanibali kas/ANQ
karali kas/ANQ
karoliuotas/ANQ
kar us/ANQ
kaspinuotas/ANQ
kaul tas/ANQ
keiksnus/ANQ
keleivi kas/ANQ
kelmuotas/ANQ
ker pli kas/ANQ
ker as/ANQ
keturkaipi kas/ANQ
ketveriopas/ANQ
kiekybi kas/ANQ
kilmingas/ANQ
kiminuotas/ANQ
kir us/ANQ
klaidus/ANQ
klastingas/ANQ
kleivas/ANQ
kli as/ANQ
kl ps ias/ANQ
kndiki kas/ANQ
kokybi kas/ANQ
kolektyvus/ANQ
komplikuotas/ANQ
konkretus/ANQ
konstruktyvus/ANQ
koringas/ANQ
kotuotas/ANQ
krap tus/ANQ
kraupus/ANQ
kremzl tas/ANQ
kriau iuotas/ANQ
kry mas/ANQ
krumpliuotas/ANQ
k das/ANQ
k lvirs ias/ANQ
k ni kas/ANQ
kupstuotas/ANQ
kurtokas/ANQ
kvai as/ANQ
labas/ADNQ
laimingas/ANQ
lai kus/ANQ
lajuotas/ANQ
lamstuotas/ANQ
lapi kas/ANQ
laupus/ANQ
leduotas/ANQ
lemtas/ANQ
lenki kas/ANQ
liaudi kas/ANQ
liekas/ANQ
liesokas/ANQ
limlus/ANQ
lipingas/ANQ
li dnas/ANQ
lygiagretus/ANQ
lygus/ANQ
lojalus/ANQ
lomus/ANQ
lupiki kas/ANQ
magus/ANQ
mai us/ANQ
malonus/ANQ
manieringas/ANQ
marguliuotas/ANQ
mar us/ANQ
matemati kas/ANQ
matus/ANQ
mazguotas/ANQ
medingas/ANQ
m g ji kas/ANQ
melagingas/ANQ
m lynokas/ANQ
meni kas/ANQ
m singas/ANQ
m suotas/ANQ
mezginiuotas/ANQ
mielinas/ANQ
miglus/ANQ
milti kas/ANQ
mink tas/ANQ
mir tamas/ANQ
mi rus/ANQ
mokestingas/ANQ
mokslingas/ANQ
moliuotas/ANQ
morali kas/AQ
muilinas/ANQ
murzinas/ANQ
muzikalus/ANQ
naguotas/ANQ
narsus/ANQ
nat ralus/ANQ
naujokas/ADNQ
nebylus/ANQ
nedr sus/ANQ
negyvas/ANQ
ne veikiamas/ANQ
nelabas/ANQ
nelygstamas/ANQ
nemok i kas/ANQ
nepadorus/ANQ
nepamainomas/ANQ
nepriklausomas/ANQ
nesavas/ANQ
neta ytas/ANQ
neveiklus/ANQ
niaurus/ANQ
nikeliuotas/ANQ
ni kus/ANQ
nykstamas/ANQ
norus/ANQ
numanus/ANQ
nuod mingas/ANQ
nuog stus/ANQ
nuolaikus/ANQ
nuosakus/ANQ
nuostolingas/ANQ
nuovokus/ANQ
nusikalstamas/ANQ
olandi kas/ANQ
optimisti kas/ANQ
originalus/ANQ
o iuotas/ANQ
padau i kas/ANQ
pagaulus/ANQ
pagiringas/ANQ
pagr stas/ANQ
painus/ANQ
paj gus/ANQ
pakankamas/ANQ
paklausus/ANQ
palaidas/ANQ
paleistuvingas/ANQ
pamokomas/ANQ
paperkamas/ANQ
paralelus/ANQ
pareigingas/ANQ
par pinamas/ANQ
pasalus/ANQ
pa  li kas/ANQ
pasiturimas/ANQ
paskidas/ANQ
paslankus/ANQ
pa litas/ANQ
pasviras/ANQ
patiklus/ANQ
patologi kas/ANQ
pavaldus/ANQ
paveiksluotas/ANQ
pavir utini kas/ANQ
pavojingas/ANQ
pa ulnus/ANQ
pel kas/ANQ
peluotas/ANQ
pergalingas/ANQ
permainingas/ANQ
pertektinas/ANQ
piemeni kas/ANQ
pietieti kas/ANQ
piktas/ANQ
pilieti kas/ANQ
piltuvi kas/ANQ
piniguotas/ANQ
pir ingas/ANQ
pj kli kas/ANQ
platokas/ANQ
plepus/ANQ
pl trus/ANQ
plynas/ANQ
plonokas/ANQ
pluo tingas/ANQ
politi kas/ANQ
portabilus/ANQ
pradaras/ADNQ
pragmati kas/ANQ
prakilnus/ANQ
pramoningas/ANQ
prana us/ANQ
prasmingas/ANQ
pratisas/ANQ
pra angus/ANQ
pr skas/ANQ
prieinamas/ANQ
prielankus/ANQ
prie ingas/ANQ
prietaringas/ANQ
prie i rus/ANQ
primityvus/ANQ
prisitaik li kas/ANQ
privatus/ANQ
produktyvus/ANQ
proporcingas/ANQ
protingas/ANQ
pr si kas/ANQ
puikus/ANQ
p lingas/ANQ
pur kus/ANQ
pus tinas/ANQ
pusn tas/ANQ
putotas/ANQ
radikalus/ANQ
raidi kas/ANQ
rai kingas/ANQ
rai us/ANQ
ramus/ANQ
rantuotas/ANQ
ratuotas/ANQ
rauk l tas/ANQ
raupuotas/ANQ
realus/ANQ
regus/ANQ
reik mingas/ANQ
religingas/ANQ
renkamas/ANQ
resvas/ANQ
rezervuotas/ANQ
riebaluotas/ANQ
riklus/ANQ
ri lus/ANQ
rizikingas/ANQ
rytieti kas/ANQ
rom ni kas/ANQ
rudeni kas/ANQ
r g tokas/ANQ
rumuni kas/AQ
r pus/ANQ
r stingas/ANQ
ruzgus/ANQ
sakali kas/ANQ
sakus/ANQ
salsvas/ANQ
s naudingas/ANQ
sanskriti kas/ANQ
sarmatingas/ANQ
saugus/ANQ
sausringas/ANQ
savarankus/ANQ
savigarbus/ANQ
savitarpi kas/ANQ
savybingas/ANQ
scholasti kas/ANQ
seklus/ANQ
senatvi kas/ANQ
sensacingas/ANQ
sergalingas/ANQ
siaurokas/ANQ
sidabri kas/ANQ
silk tas/ANQ
silpnavali kas/ANQ
simptomi kas/ANQ
sinteti kas/ANQ
siutingas/ANQ
skalnas/ANQ
skambus/ANQ
skardus/ANQ
skausmingas/ANQ
sk stas/ANQ
skiauter tas/ANQ
skirtingas/ANQ
sklandus/ANQ
skolingas/ANQ
skraubus/ANQ
skruzd l tas/ANQ
skubus/ANQ
slankus/ANQ
slavi kas/ANQ
sl nus/ANQ
slogus/ANQ
smagus/ANQ
smalstus/ANQ
smarkus/ANQ
sm liuotas/ANQ
smilt tas/ANQ
smukus/ANQ
smulkus/ANQ
snieginas/ANQ
sn dus/ANQ
sofisti kas/ANQ
sotus/ANQ
sparnuotas/ANQ
spekuliatyvus/ANQ
spindus/ANQ
spontani kas/ANQ
sprandingas/ANQ
sprudus/ANQ
spurguotas/ANQ
srautingas/ANQ
srovus/ANQ
sta ioki kas/ANQ
stalini kas/ANQ
stangus/ANQ
status/ANQ
sterilus/ANQ
stingrus/ANQ
storas/ANQ
strategi kas/ANQ
stropus/ANQ
suderinamas/ANQ
sukalbus/ANQ
s kuriuotas/ANQ
sumatus/ANQ
superlaidus/ANQ
s rokas/ANQ
sustumtas/ANQ
suverenus/ANQ
svarus/ANQ
sveikuoli kas/ANQ
svetingas/ANQ
taikingas/ANQ
takti kas/ANQ
talpus/ANQ
tamsvas/ANQ
tapatus/ANQ
tarmi kas/ANQ
tarpuotas/ANQ
taupus/ANQ
tavi kas/ANQ
technologizuotas/ANQ
teisnus/ANQ
tekstualus/BQ
teori kas/ANQ
teritorinis/BNQ
te luotas/ANQ
tiesus/ANQ
tikrovi kas/ANQ
tinkamas/ANQ
tipi kas/ANQ
tir tokas/ANQ
tykus/ANQ
toleranti kas/ANQ
tolygus/ANQ
tragi kas/ANQ
trankus/ANQ
trasus/ANQ
trejopas/ANQ
trikampi kas/ANQ
tri akas/ANQ
tri sus/ANQ
trukus/ANQ
tr nus/ANQ
tuknus/ANQ
tul us/ANQ
turtingas/ANQ
t  mingas/ANQ
tvarkus/ANQ
tvirtagali kas/ANQ
ugningas/ANQ
universalus/ANQ
uoduotas/ANQ
uoguotas/ANQ
uoslus/ANQ
urvuotas/ANQ
ut l tas/ANQ
u gaidus/ANQ
u kilas/ANQ
u pereitas/ANQ
vabaluotas/ANQ
vaidybi kas/ANQ
vaikuotas/ANQ
vaisingas/ANQ
vaistingas/ANQ
vakari kas/ANQ
valdi kas/ANQ
valgomas/ANQ
valkstus/ANQ
vamzd tas/ANQ
vandeningas/ANQ
vargingas/ANQ
varli kas/ANQ
varpotas/ANQ
var kus/ANQ
va ki kas/ANQ
veblas/ANQ
veidmainingas/ANQ
veiksmingas/ANQ
veislus/ANQ
veleni kas/ANQ
velnioni kas/ANQ
v lus/ANQ
vergi kas/ANQ
verpetingas/ANQ
ver i kas/ANQ
versmingas/ANQ
vertingas/ANQ
ve us/ANQ
v  i kas/ANQ
vienaprasmi kas/ANQ
vieningas/ANQ
vienuoli kas/ANQ
vili gi kas/ANQ
vingiuotas/ANQ
vir kus/ANQ
vispusi kas/ANQ
vyrus/ANQ
vori kas/ANQ
